Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202679-1054
State Board of Education; establish grant programs; powers; duties; report; State Department of Education Improvement Grant Fund; created; use; investment.

(1)(a) The State Board of Education shall establish an improvement grant program in areas including, but not limited to, (i) teacher recruitment and retention, (ii) improvement for schools and school districts, (iii) improvement in student performance in the subject areas of reading and mathematics, (iv) cybersecurity, and (v) other improvement areas identified by the state board. Such grants shall be funded using lottery funds under section 79-3501.

(b) On or before December 1 of each calendar year, the state board shall electronically submit a report to the Clerk of the Legislature on all such grant programs, including, but not limited to, the recipients of the programs and evaluations of the effectiveness of each grant program. The state board may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out this subsection.

(2)(a) This subsection applies beginning January 1, 2024.

(b) For purposes of this subsection, learning platform means a three-dimensional, game-based learning platform for use by middle school and high school students.

(c)(i) The State Board of Education shall establish a grant program to procure or purchase an annual license for learning platforms for use in schools to engage students in coursework and careers in science, technology, engineering, and mathematics. Such grants shall be funded using lottery funds pursuant to section 79-3501.

(ii) The State Board of Education shall establish standards that a learning platform shall meet in the subject areas of chemistry, physical science, and mathematics. The state board shall develop the criteria to prioritize the grant applications.

(iii) A developer may apply to the Commissioner of Education in a manner prescribed by the state board for a grant under this subsection for a learning platform that:

(A) Is designed to teach information related to chemistry, physical science, or mathematics;

(B) Aligns with the standards established by the state board relating to chemistry, physical science, or mathematics;

(C) Connects such standards with real-world technologies and applications;

(D) Highlights science, technology, engineering, and mathematics career pathways in Nebraska; and

(E) Meets any additional requirements set out by the State Board of Education.

(iv) Any developer that receives a grant under this subsection shall provide access to and use of its learning platform to all Nebraska school districts.

(v) Any grant awarded pursuant to this subsection shall be awarded by July 1 of each year.

(d) On or before December 1 of each calendar year, the state board shall electronically submit a report to the Clerk of the Legislature on the grant program, including, but not limited to, the recipients of the program and evaluations of the effectiveness of the grant program. The State Board of Education may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out this subsection.

(3) The State Department of Education Improvement Grant Fund is created. The fund shall be administered by the State Department of Education and shall consist of transfers pursuant to section 79-3501, repayments of grant funds, and interest payments received in the course of administering this section. The fund shall be used to carry out this section and for the centralized education records system for students under the jurisdiction of a juvenile court and the employment of registrars as provided under subsection (5) of section 79-303.01. Transfers may be made from the fund to the Education Future Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the State Department of Education Improvement Grant Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2015, LB519, § 2;

Laws 2017, LB512, § 16;

Laws 2022, LB852, § 3;

Laws 2023, LB705, § 90;

Laws 2024, LB1329, § 74;

Laws 2024, LB1413, § 49;

Laws 2025, LB296, § 3;

Laws 2026, LB937, § 13.
July 18, 2026
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.